New York, session 2025-2026, A7288.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new section 3.10 to read as follows: 3 § 3.10 Long term agreements relating to state parks and historic 4 sites. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, 5 every lease, license and management agreement, relating to the use or 6 management of any state park or historic site, having a term of more 7 than one year, entered into by the office shall comply with the recom- 8 mendations in the management or master plan of the state park or histor- 9 ic site to which the lease, license or management agreement pertains. In 10 the event a state park or historic site does not have a management or 11 master plan in effect, no lease, license or management plan relating 12 thereto shall have a term of more than one year. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately, and shall apply to leas- 14 es, licenses and management agreements entered into or renewed on or 15 after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02323-01-5